Hawaii statutes.
[§432G-4] Annual reports. (a) Each dental
insurer shall file with the commissioner:

(1) An audit, by an independent certified public
accountant or an accounting firm designated by the dental insurer of the
financial statements, reporting the financial condition and results of
operations of the dental insurer, annually on or before June 1, or a later date
as the commissioner upon request or for cause may specify. The dental insurer,
on an annual basis and prior to the commencement of the audit, shall notify the
commissioner in writing of the name and address of the person or firm retained
to conduct the annual audit. The commissioner may disapprove the dental
insurer's designation within fifteen days of receipt of the dental insurer's
notice, and the dental insurer shall be required to designate another
independent certified public accountant or accounting firm;

(2) A list of the providers who have executed a
contract that complies with section 432G‑6(d), annually on or before
March 1; and

(3) A description of the available grievance
procedures, the total number of grievances handled through those procedures, a
compilation of the causes underlying those grievances, and a summary of the
final disposition of those grievances, annually on or before March 1.

(b) The commissioner may require additional
reports as are deemed necessary and appropriate to enable the commissioner to
carry out the commissioner's duties under this chapter.

(c) Any dental insurer failing or refusing to
submit any of the documents required under this section shall be liable for a
penalty in an amount not less than $100 and not more than $500 for each day of
delinquency. Penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited
into the compliance resolution fund. [L 2013, c 191, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next